Illinois, session 104th, HB709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/1-5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 1-5)7    Sec. 1-5. Construction. The The provisions of this Code 8shall be liberally construed to effect its objects and 9purposes.10(Source: Laws 1967, p. 122.)